South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3631.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 59-1-375 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 59-1-375.  (A) AAny private school or public school, including a charter school, that serves any students in the seventhkindergarten through twelfth grades that issues student identification cards must print on either side of the cards the telephone number for the National Suicide Prevention988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline. The school mustmay also print on either side of the cards the social media platform, telephone number, or text number for at least one additional crisis resource resources selected by the school district or charter school sponsor. pursuant to the available data regarding local school or community needs, including, but not limited to: (1) the Crisis Text Line; (2) a local suicide prevention hotline, if available;  or (3) the National Teen Dating Abuse Helpline. (B) Public and private institutions of higher learning that issue student identification cards must print on either side of the cards the telephone number for the National Suicide Prevention988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline. The public or private institution of higher learning must also print on either side of the cards the social media platform, telephone number, or text number for at least one additional crisis resourceresources selected by the public or private institution of higher learning. pursuant to the available data regarding local school or community needs including, but not limited to: (1) the Crisis Text Line; (2) campus police or security or, if the campus does not have a campus police or security telephone number, the local law enforcement authority; (3) a local suicide prevention hotline;  or (4) the National Teen Dating Abuse Helpline. (C) This section applies to any student identification card issued for the first time or for replacements to a damaged or lost student identification card. (D)(C) Public schools, charter schools, and institutions of higher learning issuing student identification cards pursuant to this section shall annually and prior to the start of each school year certify to their respective governing bodies that the contact information being printed on student identification cards is up to date and reflects the current contact information for crisis resources posted on the South Carolina Department of Mental Health's website. (D) Private schools, public schools, charter schools, and institutions of higher learning that do not issue student identification cards shall annually provide the same information required by this section in an alternative, written format. The information must be made available to students at the time of registration and included: (1) on the school website; (2) on the home screen of any school computer used by students; (3) on the school agenda or calendar; or (4) at a suicide prevention awareness activity. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----